Utah statutes.
62A-3-303.   Powers and duties of Adult Protective Services.
In addition to all other powers and duties that Adult Protective Services is
given under this part, Adult Protective Services:
(1)  shall maintain an intake system for receiving and screening reports;
(2)  shall investigate reports;
(3)  shall perform protective needs assessments;
(4)  may coordinate with, or make referrals to, community resources;
(5)  may provide limited services to a vulnerable adult, on a temporary basis,
when family or community resources are not available to provide for the
protective needs of the vulnerable adult;
(6)  shall have access to facilities licensed by, or contracting with, the
department or the Department of Health for the purpose of conducting
investigations;
(7)  shall be given access to, or provided with, written statements,
documents, exhibits, and other items related to an investigation, including
medical or financial records of a vulnerable adult who is the subject of an
investigation if:
(a)  for a vulnerable adult who does not lack the capacity to consent, the
vulnerable adult signs a release of information; or
(b)  for a vulnerable adult who lacks the capacity to consent, an
administrative subpoena is issued by Adult Protective Services;
(8)  may institute proceedings in a court of competent jurisdiction to seek
relief necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter;
(9)  may require all persons, including family members of a vulnerable adult
and any caretaker, to cooperate with Adult Protective Services in carrying out
its duties under this chapter, including conducting investigations and
providing protective services;
(10)  may require all officials, agencies, departments, and political
subdivisions of the state to assist and cooperate within their jurisdictional
power with the court, the division, and Adult Protective Services in
furthering the purposes of this chapter;
(11)  may conduct studies and compile data regarding abuse, neglect, and
exploitation; and
(12)  may issue reports and recommendations.
